Nebraska, session 109, LB430.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB430 LB430
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-265, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-265 (1) Except as provided in section 79-265.01, the principal
may deny any student the right to attend school or to take part in any
school function for a period of up to five school days on the following
grounds:
(a) Conduct constituting grounds for expulsion as set out in the
Student Discipline Act; or
(b) Any other violation of rules and standards of behavior adopted
under the act.
(2) Such short-term suspension shall be made only after the
principal has made an investigation of the alleged conduct or violation
and has determined that such suspension is necessary to help any student,
to further school purposes, or to prevent an interference with school
purposes.
(3) Before such short-term suspension takes effect, the student
shall be given oral or written notice of the charges against him or her,
an explanation of the evidence the authorities have, and an opportunity
to present his or her version.
(4)(a) (4) Within twenty-four hours or such additional time as is
reasonably necessary, not to exceed an additional forty-eight hours,
following such suspension, the principal shall send a written statement
to the student and his or her parent or guardian describing:
(i) The the student's conduct, misconduct, or violation of the rule
or standard; and
(ii) The the reasons for the action taken; .
(iii) The actions made by the school to try to discontinue or
alleviate the behavior of the student prior to considering suspension;
(iv) Resources the school can provide or recommend to assist the
student; and
(v) How the school plans to handle such behavior moving forward,
-2-

LB430 LB430
2025 2025
including an actionable plan aimed at maximizing strategies to keep the
student in school.
(b) The principal shall make a reasonable effort to hold a
conference with the parent or guardian before or at the time the student
returns to school and shall document such effort in writing.
Sec. 2. Section 79-265.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-265.01 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
an elementary school shall not suspend a student in pre-kindergarten
through second grade. Each school district shall develop a policy to
implement this section which shall include disciplinary measures inside
the school as an alternative to suspension.
(2) An elementary school may suspend a student in pre-kindergarten
through second grade if such student:
(a) Brings brings a deadly weapon as defined in section 28-109 onto
on school grounds, into in a vehicle owned, leased, or contracted by a
school being used for a school purpose or into in a vehicle being driven
for a school purpose by a school employee or his or her designee, or to
at a school-sponsored activity or athletic event; or .
(b) Engages in violent behavior capable of causing physical harm to
another student or school employee.
Sec. 3. Section 79-268, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-268 If a principal makes a decision to discipline a student by
long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, the following
procedures shall be followed:
(1) The decision as to recommend discipline shall be made within two
school days after learning of the alleged student misconduct. On the date
of the decision, a written charge and a summary of the evidence
supporting such charge shall be filed with the superintendent. The school
shall, within two school days after the decision, send written notice by
-3-

LB430 LB430
2025 2025
registered or certified mail to the student and his or her parent or
guardian informing them of the rights established under the Student
Discipline Act;
(2) Such written notice shall include the following:
(a) The rule or standard of conduct allegedly violated and the acts
of the student alleged to constitute a cause for long-term suspension,
expulsion, or mandatory reassignment, including a summary of the evidence
to be presented against the student;
(b) The penalty, if any, which the principal has recommended in the
charge and any other penalty to which the student may be subject;
(c) Resources the school can provide or recommend to assist the
student;
(d) How the school plans to handle such behavior moving forward,
including an actionable plan aimed at maximizing strategies to keep the
student in school;
(e) (c) A statement that, before long-term suspension, expulsion, or
mandatory reassignment can be invoked, the student has a right to a
hearing, upon request, and that if the student is suspended pending the
outcome of the hearing, the student may complete classwork and homework,
including, but not limited to, examinations, missed during the period of
suspension pursuant to district guidelines which shall not require the
student to attend the school district's alternative programs for expelled
students in order to complete classwork or homework;
(f) (d) A description of the hearing procedures provided by the act,
along with procedures for appealing any decision rendered at the hearing;
(g) (e) A statement that the principal, legal counsel for the
school, the student, the student's parent, or the student's
representative or guardian has the right (i) to examine the student's
academic and disciplinary records and any affidavits to be used at the
hearing concerning the alleged misconduct and (ii) to know the identity
of the witnesses to appear at the hearing and the substance of their
-4-

LB430 LB430
2025 2025
testimony; and
(h) (f) A form on which the student, the student's parent, or the
student's guardian may request a hearing, to be signed by such parties
and delivered to the principal or superintendent in person or by
registered or certified mail to the address provided on such form, as
prescribed in sections 79-271 and 79-272;
(3) When a notice of intent to discipline a student by long-term
suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment is filed with the
superintendent, the student may be suspended by the principal until the
date the long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes
effect, if the principal determines that the student must be suspended
immediately to prevent or substantially reduce the risk of (a)
interference with an educational function or school purpose or (b) a
personal injury to the student himself or herself, other students, school
employees, or school volunteers; and
(4) For purposes of this section, mandatory reassignment, regardless
of its implementation date, shall be subject to the procedures of this
section.
The Student Discipline Act does not preclude the student or the
student's parent, guardian, or representative from discussing and
settling the matter with appropriate school personnel prior to the time
the long-term suspension, expulsion, or mandatory reassignment takes
effect.
Sec. 4. Original sections 79-265, 79-265.01, and 79-268, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-